Oklahoma, session 2026, SB184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 241.5 of Title 56, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Department of Human Services shall, through broad-based


categorical eligibility (BBCE), extend benefits under the


Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) to households who


qualify for a non-cash Temporary Assistance for Needy Families


(TANF) funded benefit or state maintenance of effort (MOE) funded


benefit and who meet all other criteria for SNAP BBCE.



Req. No. 240 Page 1


B. The income limit shall be one hundred seventy percent (170%)


of the federal poverty level (FPL) guidelines and there shall be no


asset limit for SNAP BBCE under this section.


C. The Department shall seek any federal approval and fulfill


any federal requirements necessary to implement the provisions of


this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-240 DC 12/30/2024 1:37:11 PM























Req. No. 240 Page 2